Florida, session 2026, HB1533.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (8) of section 627.4463, Florida
Statutes, as created by HB 1531 or similar legislation, 2026
Regular Session, is amended to read:
627.4463 Florida Health Insurance Exchange; government-
facilitated purchases and sales of individual and small employer
health and dental plans.—
(8) FUNDING; PUBLICATION OF COSTS; VENDOR TO BUILD AND
MANAGE EXCHANGE.—
(a) The exchange may charge assessments or user fees to
health carriers or otherwise may generate funding necessary to
support the operations provided under this section.
(b) The exchange shall publish the average costs of
licensing, regulatory fees, and any other payments required by
the exchange, and the administrative costs of the exchange, on a
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1533-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1533 2026
website to educate consumers on such costs. This information
must include information on moneys lost to waste, fraud, and
abuse.
(c) The commissioner and the office shall contract with a
vendor selected by a competitive procurement to build and manage
the exchange.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, but
only if HB 1531 or similar legislation is adopted in the same
legislative session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1533-00